District of Columbia statutes.
11-1744

Information and liaison services.

The Executive Officer shall be responsible for —

(1)

collecting and compiling statistical information with respect to the volume and disposition of the work of the courts and the personnel of the courts;

(2)

printing and the distribution of court rules;

(3)

keeping the courts advised of pending legislative and executive actions relating to the courts;

(4)

serving as the public information officer of the courts; and

(5)

performing such other duties as may be assigned to the Executive Officer by the Joint Committee and the chief judges in their respective courts.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 514, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111
June 13, 1994, Pub. L. 103-266, § 1(b)(93), 108 Stat. 713
1981 Ed., § 11-1744.
1973 Ed., § 11-1744.